test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_I_NoExtra_nagizh_gt-norm.yaml
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nagizhenhimishiniibanag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nagizhenhimishiniibaning
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninagizhensimishiniibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninagizhensimishiniibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninagizhensimishiniibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninagizhenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninagizhenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninagizhenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninagizhenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninagizhenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninagizhenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginagizhensimishiniibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginagizhensimishiniibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginagizhensimishiniibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginagizhenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginagizhenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginagizhenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginagizhenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginagizhenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginagizhenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onagizhensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onagizhensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onagizhensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onagizhensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onagizhensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onagizhensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onagizhensimishiniibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onagizhensimishiniibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onagizhensimishiniibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onagizhensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onagizhensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onagizhensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onagizhenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onagizhenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onagizhenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onagizhenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onagizhenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onagizhenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onagizhenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onagizhenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onagizhenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onagizhenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onagizhenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
